South Dakota, session 2026, HB1028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 36-26-13 be AMENDED:
36-26-13. The board shall issue a license as a certified social worker, a social
worker, or a social work associate, or a multistate license as provided in § 36-26A-1.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 36-26:
An applicant for a multistate license, as provided in § 36-26A-1, shall submit to
the board a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the
board. The board shall deliver the fingerprints to the Division of Criminal Investigation for
a state and federal criminal background check by the division and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation. The applicant shall sign a release of information to the board, and pay any
fees charged for the fingerprinting and the background check.
Upon completion of the background check, the division shall deliver to the board
the applicant's criminal history record information. The board shall consider this
information in determining whether to issue a multistate license to the applicant. The
board may not issue a multistate license to the applicant before receiving this information.
The board may not disseminate any information obtained under this section to a person
not employed by the board.

26.370.10 2 1028
An Act to establish a criminal background check requirement for multistate licensure under
the social work licensure compact.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1028
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1028 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1028 ENROLLED